Utah, session 2026, HB394.
Section 1. Section 58-28-302 is amended to read:58-28-302. License qualifications.(1)Every applicant for a license to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry shall:(a)pass an examination approved by the board on the theory and practice of the science of veterinary medicine, surgery, dentistry, and other subjects determined by the board, knowledge of which is generally required of veterinarians;(b)(i)graduate from a veterinary college accredited by the AVMA; or(ii)obtain a certificate issued by the Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates issued by the AVMA;(c)(i)have practiced under the supervision of a veterinarian licensed to practice in this state for a period of at least six monthsat least 1,000 hours;(ii)have participated in veterinary investigational, educational, or sanitary control work of a nature and duration as to be the equivalent of the experience of Subsection (1)(c)(i);(iii)have practiced as a licensed veterinarian outside Utah for a period of at least six monthsat least 1,000 hours; or(iv)have practiced as a veterinarian while employed by the United States government, its agencies, or the state or its political subdivisions for a period of at least six monthsat least 1,000 hours; and(d)pay a fee to the Department of Commerce determined in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 for the examination, for an initial license, and for a renewal license.(2)(a)An applicant for licensure as a veterinary intern shall comply with the provisions of Subsection (1)(b).(b)An applicant's license as a veterinary intern is limited to the period of time necessary to complete clinical training as described in Subsection (1)(c) and extends not more than one year from the date the minimum requirement for training is completed, unless the individual presents satisfactory evidence to the division and the board that the individual is making reasonable progress toward passing the qualifying examination or is otherwise on a course reasonably expected to lead to licensure as a veterinarian, but the period of time under this Subsection (2)(b) may not exceed two years past the date the minimum supervised clinical training has been completed.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.